New York, session 2025-2026, S477.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 130.35 of the penal law, as amended by chapter 777 2 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 130.35 Rape in the first degree. 4 A person is guilty of rape in the first degree when: 5 1. [he or she] such person engages in vaginal sexual contact with 6 another person: 7 (a) By forcible compulsion; or 8 (b) Who is incapable of consent by reason of being physically help- 9 less; or 10 (c) Who is less than eleven years old; or 11 (d) Who is less than thirteen years old and the actor is eighteen 12 years old or more; 13 2. [he or she] such person engages in oral sexual contact with another 14 person: 15 (a) By forcible compulsion; or 16 (b) Who is incapable of consent by reason of being physically help- 17 less; or 18 (c) Who is less than eleven years old; or 19 (d) Who is less than thirteen years old and the actor is eighteen 20 years old or more; or 21 3. [he or she] such person engages in anal sexual contact with another 22 person: 23 (a) By forcible compulsion; or EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01127-01-5 S. 477 2 1 (b) Who is incapable of consent by reason of being physically help- 2 less; or 3 (c) Who is less than eleven years old; or 4 (d) Who is less than thirteen years old and the actor is eighteen 5 years old or more. 6 Rape in the first degree is a class [B] A-II felony. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.